src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-pess_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pess a-stem: # Noun 'rifle' - full paradigm
     pess+N+Sg+Nom: pess
     pess+N+Sg+Gen: peess
     pess+N+Sg+Acc: peess
     pess+N+Sg+Ill: pissu
     pess+N+Sg+Loc: peessast
     pess+N+Sg+Com: peessain
     pess+N+Ess: pessan
     pess+N+Par: pessad
     pess+N+Sg+Abe: [peesstaa, peesstää]
     pess+N+Pl+Nom: peess
     pess+N+Pl+Gen: peessai
     pess+N+Pl+Acc: peessaid
     pess+N+Pl+Ill: peessaid
     pess+N+Pl+Loc: peessain
     pess+N+Pl+Com: peessaivuiʹm
     pess+N+Pl+Abe: [peessaitaa, peessaitää]
     pess+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: piissuž
